Hawaii statutes.
[§196D-9] Construction of the chapter;
rules. This chapter shall be construed liberally to effectuate its
purposes, and the department shall have all powers which may be necessary to
carry out the purposes of this chapter, including the authority to make, amend,
and repeal rules to implement this chapter; provided that all procedures for
public information and review under chapter 91 shall be preserved; and provided
further that the consolidated permit application and review process shall not
affect or invalidate the jurisdiction or authority of any agency under existing
law. The adoption, amendment, and repeal of all rules shall be subject to
chapter 91. [L 1988, c 301, pt of §1]

Revision Note

In title, "chapter" substituted for
"Act".

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next